Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. Cancellations and Renewals.

Sec. 21.36.210.
Limits on cancellation.

An insurer may not exercise its right to cancel a policy of personal automobile insurance except for the following reasons:

nonpayment of premium; or

the driver’s license or motor vehicle registration of either the named insured or of an operator who resides in the same household as the named insured or who customarily operates a motor vehicle insured under the policy has been under suspension or revocation during the policy period or, if the policy is a renewal, during its policy period or the 180 days immediately preceding its effective date.

During the policy period, a modification of automobile physical damage coverage, except coverage for loss caused by collision, whereby provision is made for the application of a deductible amount not exceeding $100 is not a cancellation of the coverage or of the policy.

[Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

This section does not apply to

the failure to renew a policy, except as to coverage in force for less than 12 months;

a policy that has been in effect less than 60 days at the time notice of cancellation is mailed or delivered by the insurer, unless it is a renewal policy.

[Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

An insurer may not exercise its right to cancel a policy of personal insurance other than personal automobile insurance, except for the following reasons:

nonpayment of premiums, including nonpayment of additional premiums, calculated in accordance with the current rating manual of the insurer, justified by a physical change in the insured property or a change in its occupancy or use;

conviction of the insured of a crime having as one of its necessary elements an act increasing a hazard insured against;

discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation made by the insured or a representative of the insured in obtaining the insurance or by the insured in pursuing a claim under the policy;

discovery of a grossly negligent act or omission by the insured that substantially increases the hazards insured against;

physical changes in the insured property that result in the property becoming uninsurable; or

entire abandonment of the property that increases a hazard insured against; if a policy is cancelled under this paragraph, in addition to the notice required under AS

21.36.220

, the insurer shall give notice of cancellation of the policy to a lender on file with the insurer at the time of the cancellation; in this paragraph, “entire abandonment” means the property is no longer occupied by the insured as defined by the policy and does not have contents of substantial utility; however, property is not entirely abandoned if the insured or an agent for the insured demonstrates that the property is being reasonably maintained and monitored for a condition that might cause damage to the property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1972; am §§ 32 — 34, 47 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 67 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2014; am § 16 ch 32 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (a)(2) of this section, “AS

21.96.027

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.027” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.027.

Administrative Code. —

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 21, 2014, added (f)(6), and made a related change.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (a)(2), deleted “; this paragraph does not apply to revocation as described under AS

21.96.027

” at the end.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 54, SLA 2014, paragraph (f)(6) “applies to property that becomes entirely abandoned on or after September 21, 2014.”

Sec. 21.36.212.
[Renumbered as AS 21.36.096.]

Sec. 21.36.220.
Notice of cancellation.

An insurer may not exercise its right to cancel a personal insurance policy unless, for a named insured who is

less than 70 years of age, a written notice of cancellation is mailed to the named insured as required by AS

21.36.260

at least 30 days before the effective date of cancellation; however, if cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice shall be mailed to the named insured as required by AS

21.36.260

at least 20 days before the effective date of cancellation, and, if cancellation is for a reason described in AS

21.36.210(a)(2)

, (f)(2), or (f)(3), the notice shall be mailed to the named insured as required by AS 21.36.260 at least 10 days before the effective date of cancellation; and

70 years of age or older, a written notice of cancellation is mailed to the named insured and, if the named insured has made a written request to the insurer, to the named insured’s designee as required by AS 21.36.260 at least 30 days before the effective date of cancellation; however, if cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice shall be mailed to the named insured and, if the named insured has made a written request to the insurer, to the named insured’s designee as required by AS 21.36.260 at least 20 days before the effective date of cancellation, and, if cancellation is for a reason described in AS

21.36.210(a)(2)

, (f)(2), or (f)(3), the notice shall be mailed to the named insured and, if the named insured has made a written request to the insurer, to the named insured’s designee as required by AS 21.36.260 at least 10 days before the effective date of cancellation; an insurer who provides a personal insurance policy to an insured who is 70 years of age or older shall annually give written notice to the insured of the insured’s right to have a designee receive notice as provided in this paragraph.

An insurer may not exercise its right to cancel a policy of business or commercial insurance unless a written notice of cancellation is mailed to the named insured as required by AS

21.36.260

and to the agent or broker of record at least 60 days before the effective date of cancellation. However, if cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, or for failure or refusal of the insured to provide the information necessary to confirm exposure or necessary to determine the policy premium, the notice shall be mailed to the named insured as required by AS

21.36.260

and to the agent or broker of record at least 20 days before the effective date of cancellation. If cancellation is (1) for conviction of the insured of a crime having as one of its necessary elements an act increasing a hazard insured against, or (2) for discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation made by the insured or a representative of the insured in obtaining the insurance or by the insured in pursuing a claim under the policy, the notice shall be mailed to the named insured as required by AS 21.36.260 and to the agent or broker of record at least 10 days before the effective date of cancellation.

If an insurer cancels a policy under this section, it shall return or credit any unearned premium to the agent or broker of record or directly to the insured or premium finance company, if applicable, before the effective date of cancellation, except that

an unearned premium shall be returned or credited within 45 days after notice of cancellation is given, if cancellation is for

nonpayment of premium, including nonpayment of additional premiums, calculated in accordance with the current rating manual of the insurer, justified by a physical change in the insured property, a change in its occupancy or use, or a change in payroll, receipts, values, or other exposure units;

conviction of the insured of a crime having as one of its necessary elements an act increasing a hazard insured against;

discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation made by the insured or a representative of the insured in obtaining the insurance or by the insured in pursuing a claim under the policy;

failure or refusal of the insured to provide the information necessary to confirm exposure or necessary to determine the policy premium;

a reason described in AS

21.36.210(a)(2)

;

the insurer shall perform or waive the audit before the effective date of the cancellation and return or credit any estimated unearned premium before the effective date of cancellation if the policy is subject to audit and is cancelled for a reason other than those described in (1)(A) — (D) of this subsection.

The division may require an insurer to perform an audit that the insurer has elected to waive under (c) of this section.

A notice of cancellation of insurance required to be given under this section must include or be accompanied by a statement of the reason for the cancellation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am §§ 35, 36 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 143 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Sec. 21.36.225.
Notice of health insurance coverage cancellation, coverage change, or premium change.

Except for a health care insurance policy subject to AS

21.51.400

or AS

21.54.130

, an insurer may not cancel a health insurance policy unless the insurer provides written notice to a policyholder at least 45 days before the effective date of the cancellation.

An insurer shall provide written notice to a policyholder of the specific changes in coverage or the exact change in premium at least 45 days before the effective date of the change in coverage or premium.

History.

(§ 59 ch 23 SLA 2011; am § 32 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, twice substituted “policyholder” for “covered individual”; in (9)(b), inserted “the specific” preceding “changes in coverage”, inserted “the exact change in” preceding “premium”.

Sec. 21.36.230.
Statement of reasons. [Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 21.36.235.
Notice of premium or coverage changes upon renewal.

Except as provided in AS

21.36.305

, if the renewal premium is increased more than 10 percent for a reason other than an increase in coverage or exposure base, or if after renewal there will be a material restriction or reduction in coverage not specifically requested by the insured, written notice shall be mailed to the insured and to the agent or broker of record as required by AS

21.36.260

at least 20 days before expiration of a personal insurance policy; or

at least 45 days before expiration of a business or commercial policy.

If notice before expiration of the policy is not given as required by (a) of this section, the existing policy shall continue until the insurer provides notice for the time period required by (a) of this section for that policy.

This section does not apply to workers’ compensation insurance or to business or commercial policies issued under AS 21.34.

History.

(§ 37 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 58 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 39 ch 96 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.36.240.
Failure to renew.

An insurer may only fail to renew a personal insurance policy on the policy’s annual anniversary. An insurer may not fail to renew a policy unless a written notice of nonrenewal is mailed to the named insured under AS

21.36.260

at least 20 days for a personal insurance policy, and at least 45 days for a business or commercial insurance policy, before the date the policy expires or the anniversary date of a policy written for a term longer than one year or with no fixed expiration date.

In addition to the requirements in (a) of this section, an insurer may not fail to renew a homeowner’s insurance policy based solely on the earliest claim made by the insured within the three-year period immediately preceding the policy’s annual anniversary if the claim arises from a criminal act committed by a third party. In this subsection, “homeowner’s insurance” includes coverage described in AS

21.36.460(i)(7)(B)

and (C).

If notice of nonrenewal is not given as required by this section, the existing policy shall continue until the insurer provides notice for the period required by this section for the policy.

This section does not apply

if the insurer has in good faith manifested its willingness to renew;

in case of nonpayment of premium for the expiring policy;

if the insured fails to pay the premium as required by the insurer for renewal; or

to business or commercial policies placed under AS 21.34.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am § 38 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 36 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 40 ch 96 SLA 2004; am §§ 1, 2 ch 27 SLA 2020)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, rewrote (a); and added (b) – (d).

Editor's notes. —

Under § 4,
ch. 27, SLA 2020, the changes to this section made in secs. 1 and 2 of that Act “apply to an insurance policy or contract entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.”

Sec. 21.36.250.
Cancellation or nonrenewal of automobile insurance.

When a policy of automobile liability insurance is cancelled, other than for nonpayment of premium, or is not renewed in accordance with AS

21.36.240

, the insurer shall notify the named insured of possible eligibility for automobile insurance through the automobile assigned risk plan, or automobile insurance plan.
The notification must accompany or be included in the notice of cancellation or nonrenewal required by AS

21.36.220

and

21.36.240

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am § 39 ch 29 SLA 1987)

Sec. 21.36.255.
Premium return or credit.

If an insurance policy is cancelled, rejected, or rescinded by the

insurer, the insurer shall return or credit any unearned premium paid to the agent or broker of record, or directly to the insured or premium finance company, if applicable; or

insured, the insurer shall return or credit any unearned premium to the agent or broker of record or directly to the insured or premium finance company, if applicable, less a cancellation fee not to exceed 7.5 percent of the unearned premium; a cancellation fee may not be charged unless the fee is clearly stated in the policy; the insurer shall return or credit the unearned premium less a lawful cancellation fee

within 45 days of receipt of the request for cancellation or the effective date of cancellation, whichever is later; or

if the policy is selected for audit, within 45 days of completion of an audit; the insurer shall perform and complete an audit within 45 days of receipt of the request for cancellation or the effective date of cancellation, whichever is later.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if the insurer clearly indicates one or more of the following features in the policy, an insurer may issue a policy

whose premium is earned at a varying rate due to seasonality of exposure;

that contains a minimum earned premium; or

with a fluctuating premium base.

History.

(§ 40 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 144 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Administrative Code. —

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

Sec. 21.36.260.
Proof and method of mailing notice.

If a notice is required from an insurer under this chapter, the insurer shall

mail the notice by first class mail to the last known address of the insured and

transmit the notice by electronic means, to the last known electronic address of the intended recipient, if the insurer can obtain an electronic confirmation of receipt by the intended recipient.

obtain a certificate of mailing from the United States Postal Service; or

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am § 41 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 33 ch 80 SLA 2006)

Sec. 21.36.270.
Effect of failure to comply.

Notwithstanding the failure of an insurer to comply with AS

21.36.210

—

21.36.310

, termination of coverage under the policy either by cancellation or nonrenewal is effective on the effective date of any other policy providing similar coverage on the same risk or motor vehicle or a replacement of it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 1972)

Sec. 21.36.280.
Immunity of insurer, director, and informer.

There is no liability on the part of, and a cause of action of any nature may not arise against, the director of insurance or against an insurer, its authorized representatives, agents, or employees, or a person furnishing to the insurer information as to reasons for cancellation, for any statement made by any of them in a written notice of cancellation, or in any other communication, oral or written, specifying the reasons for cancellation, or the providing of information pertaining to a cancellation or for statements made or evidence submitted at a hearing conducted in connection with a cancellation.
However, this immunity from liability does not apply when the information furnished or statement made is untrue and the person furnishing the information or making the statement knew of the lack of truth or was grossly negligent in ascertaining the truth.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970)

Sec. 21.36.290.
Policy period.

A policy with a policy period or term longer than one year or a policy with no fixed expiration date shall be considered to be written for successive policy periods or terms of one year, and termination by an insurer effective on an anniversary date of the policy shall be considered a failure to renew.

The rate for a personal automobile insurance policy may not be changed more frequently than once every six months.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am §§ 59, 60 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 37 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.36.300.
Applicability of AS 21.36.210 — 21.36.310. [Repealed, § 47 ch 29 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 21.36.305.
Premium increases on personal automobile insurance policies.

An insurer may not increase the premium on a personal automobile insurance policy unless the increase applies to all insureds of the same class.

An insurer may not increase the premium or add a surcharge to a personal automobile insurance policy because of the issuance of a citation for a moving traffic violation unless the insured or another person who resides in the insured’s household and is covered by the policy has been convicted of the violation or has entered a plea of no contest to the violation.

The director shall adopt regulations to determine circumstances under which an insurer may increase the premium or add a surcharge to a personal automobile insurance policy.

An insurer that increases the premium or adds a surcharge to a personal automobile insurance policy may only make the increase or surcharge effective on the renewal date of the policy.

An insurer that increases the premium or adds a surcharge to a personal automobile insurance policy shall give written notice of the increase or surcharge at least 20 days before it takes effect, stating the reason for the change and the right of appeal under AS

21.39.090

. This subsection does not apply to

premium increase resulting from a change requested by an insured, if the insured is notified at the time the request is made that the amount of the insured’s premium will change as a result of the requested policy change; or

rate approved by the director if the insurer gives written notice of a premium increase to the insured at least 20 days before the renewal date of the affected policy.

History.

(§ 61 ch 62 SLA 1995)

Sec. 21.36.307.
Effect of overweight vehicle offenses on personal automobile insurance.

An insurer may not take adverse action relating to the personal automobile insurance of a driver who commits one or more violations related to an overweight vehicle under AS

45.75.380(a)(10)

or (11).

In this section, “adverse action” means the cancellation, refusal to insure, denial or failure to renew, increase in premiums, placement with an affiliate that charges higher premiums or offers less favorable policy terms, or any other action that increases the cost or decreases the extent of coverage or availability of personal automobile insurance to the driver.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 2006)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5(a), ch. 81, SLA 2006, provides that this section applies “to an adverse action taken by an insurer on or after June 29, 2006, relating to a violation of vehicle weight limitations occurring before, on, or after June 29, 2006.”

Sec. 21.36.310.
Definitions.

In AS

21.36.210

—

21.36.310

,

“business or commercial insurance” means insurance other than personal insurance, reinsurance, life insurance, health insurance, fidelity and surety insurance, title insurance, or an annuity contract;

“nonpayment of premium” means failure of the named insured to discharge when due any obligations of the named insured in connection with the payment of premium on a policy, or any installment of the premium, whether the premium is payable directly to the insurer or its agent or indirectly under any premium finance plan or extension of credit;

“personal automobile insurance” means insurance not related to business or commercial activities, covering automobile liability, uninsured or underinsured motorists, automobile medical payments, or automobile physical damage, that is delivered or issued for delivery in this state, and under which the insured vehicles are of the following types only:

a motor vehicle of the private passenger or station wagon type that is not used as a public or livery conveyance, nor rented to others; or

any other four-wheel motor vehicle with a load capacity of 1,500 pounds or less that is not used in the occupation, profession, or business of the insured, nor used as a public or livery conveyance, nor rented to others;

“personal insurance” has the meaning given in AS

21.36.460(i)

;

“renewal” or “renew” means

the issuance and delivery of an insurance policy at the end of the policy period, that replaces a policy previously issued and delivered by the same insurer;

the issuance and delivery of a certificate or notice extending the term of a policy beyond its policy period or term; or

the extension of the term of a policy beyond its policy period or term under a provision for extending the policy by payment of a continuation premium.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 13 SLA 1972; am § 42 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 145 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 34 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 2020)

Administrative Code. —

For schedule and individual risk rating plans, see 3 AAC 29, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2020 amendment, effective July 1, 2020, in (4), added “has the meaning given in AS

21.36.460(i)

” and deleted paragraphs (A) and (B) defining “personal insurance”.

Collateral references. —

Transmission of insurance policy to insurance agent as satisfying provision requiring delivery to insured. 19 ALR3d 953.